Rhode Island, session 2025, SB711.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 42-113-3, 42-113-4, 42-113-5, 42-113-6 and 42-113-7 of the
General Laws in Chapter 42-113 entitled "Rhode Island Housing and Conservation Trust Fund Act"
are hereby amended to read as follows:
42-113-3. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Agricultural land” means any land which is actively devoted to agricultural or
horticultural use including, but not limited to, a commercial enterprise or community garden
enterprise which has its primary purpose horticulture, viticulture, viniculture, floriculture, forestry,
composting, stabling of horses, dairy farming, or aquaculture, or the raising of livestock, fur-
bearing animals, poultry or bees.
(2) “Board” means the Rhode Island housing and conservation board established by this
chapter.
(2)(3) “Eligible activity” means any activity that will carry out either or both of the dual
purposes of creating and sustaining low and moderate income housing and conserving and
protecting important Rhode Island lands, including activities that will encourage or assist:
(i) The preservation, rehabilitation, or development of residential dwelling units which are
affordable to lower low- or moderate-income Rhode Islanders Island households;
(ii) The protection of important wildlife habitat and important natural areas;

(iii) The preservation of historic properties of resources;
(iv) The protection of areas suited for outdoor public recreational activity;
(v) The retention of agricultural land for agricultural use; and
(vi) The development of capacity on the part of an eligible applicant to engage in an eligible
activity.
(3)(4) “Eligible applicant” means any municipality or department of state government of
the state, nonprofit organization qualifying under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) or limited equity
cooperative housing corporation, a company that is licensed to do business in the State of Rhode
Island where the proposed application creates or preserves housing that serves or intends to serve
whose purpose is either the creation or preservation of low and moderate income households; or
any municipality or department of state government of this state, nonprofit organization qualifying
under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) that conserves or protects important natural areas, wildlife habitat,
housing for lower income Rhode Islanders or the conservation of open lands or agricultural lands.
(4)(5) “Fund” means the Rhode Island housing and conservation trust fund established by
this chapter.
(5)(6) “Historic property or resource” means any building, structure, object, district, area,
or site that is significant in the history, architecture, archeology, or culture of this state, its
communities, or the nation.
(6)(7) “Important natural area” means any area containing one or more state or federal
endangered or threatened species as defined in the general laws or any area essential to maintaining
the ecological diversity or natural heritage of the state.
(7) “Lower income” means households whose incomes do not exceed sixty percent (60%)
of the median family income by family size for the area of the state in which the family lives as
determined annually by the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.
(8) “Low- or moderate-income households” means households that meet the definition of
low- and moderate-income under § 45-53-3.
42-113-4. Creation of the Rhode Island housing and conservation board.
(a) There is hereby authorized, created and established a body politic and corporate to be
known as the “Rhode Island housing and conservation board” to carry out the provisions of this
chapter. The board is constituted a public instrumentality exercising public and essential
governmental functions, and the exercise by the board of the powers conferred by this chapter are
deemed and held to be the performance of an essential governmental function of the state.
(b) The board shall consist of nine (9) fifteen (15) members:
(1) The four (4) non-voting ex-officio members shall include the director of the department
LC000615 - Page 2 of 8

of environmental management, or a designee; the director of the office of intergovernmental affairs/
the secretary of the department of housing, or designee; the executive director of the Rhode Island
housing and mortgage finance corporation, or designee; and the director of the office of statewide
planning, or designee.
(2) The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint five (5) eleven
(11) voting members of the general public. The public appointees shall include at least one member
representing the interests of the environmental community, one member representing the interests
of the conservation and land trust community, one member representing family farm interests, a
municipal planner representing a city or town with more than forty thousand (40,000) residents, a
municipal planner representing a city or town with less than forty thousand (40,000) residents, one
member representing the interests of nonprofit community development corporations, one member
representing the interests of the housing land trust community, one member representing the
interests of the for-profit developer/builder community, one member representing land use
planning/smart growth interests, one member representing a tenant advocacy organization, and one
member representing historic preservation. The public appointees should reflect the demographic
diversity of the state including, but not limited to, representation from black, brown and indigenous
communities. In making these appointments, the governor shall give due consideration to
recommendations made by the Rhode Island Community Reinvestment Association, Environment
Council of Rhode Island, Rhode Island Association of Land Trusts, and representatives of tenancy
advocacy and family farm associations.
(3) Any designee of the four (4) governmental members serving ex-officio as stipulated in
subsection (b)(1) of this section or of the three (3) members who is a chair or president of a
nongovernmental organization as stipulated in subsection (b)(2) of this section shall be a
subordinate of the designator within his or her respective department, office, or nongovernmental
organization. These designees shall represent him or her at all meetings of the board.
(4) No one shall be eligible for public appointment unless the person is a resident of this
state.
(5) Newly appointed and qualified public members and designees of ex-officio members
shall, within six (6) months of their qualification or designation, attend a training course that is
developed by non-voting ex officio members with board approval and conducted by the chair or
the chair’s designee and shall include instruction in the subject area of chapter 113 of this title and
chapter 46 of this title, chapter 14 of title 36, and chapter 2 of title 38; and the board’s rules and
regulations.
(c) Those members of the board as of July 9, 2005 who were appointed to the board by
LC000615 - Page 3 of 8

members of the general assembly shall cease to be members of the commission on July 9, 2005.
Appointments to the board shall be made by December 31, 2026. Public members of the board
appointed by the governor will be appointed for three-year (3) terms and cannot serve more than
two (2) consecutive terms.
(d) Annually, the board governor shall elect select from among its public members a
chairperson. The board shall elect from among its members a and vice-chairperson. The board may
elect from among its members and any other officers it deems necessary. Meetings shall be held at
the call of the chairperson or at the request of three (3) members. A majority of the sitting members
shall constitute a quorum and action taken by the board under the provisions of this chapter may be
authorized by a majority of the members present and voting at any regular or special meeting.
(e) Three (3) or more voting members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. A majority vote of those present shall be required for action. No vacancy
in the membership of the board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all of the rights and
perform all of the duties of the board.
(f) Any vacancy which may occur in the board shall be filled accordingly in the same
manner as prescribed above.
(g)(1) The board shall governor may appoint and employ an executive director, and it shall
be the executive director’s duty to:
(1)(i) Supervise and administer allocations made through the trust fund in accordance with
this chapter and with the rules and regulations of the board;
(2)(ii) Act as the chief administrative officer having general charge of the office and records
and to employ temporarily, subject to the approval of the board, necessary personnel to serve at the
executive director’s pleasure and who shall be in the unclassified service and whose salaries shall
be set by the board;
(3)(iii) Act as executive secretary of the board; and
(4)(iv) Perform other duties as determined by the board, which are in accordance with this
chapter and with the rules and regulations of the board.
(2) The governor may remove any member for cause or misconduct in office after giving
the member a copy of the charges/allegations against them and an opportunity to be heard, in
person, or with or by counsel, in their defense, upon not less than ten (10) days notice. If any
member shall be removed, the governor shall file in the office of the secretary of state a complete
statement of charges made against the member and the governor's findings, together with a
complete record of the proceedings.
(3) Whenever public hearings are required under this chapter, or whenever the board
LC000615 - Page 4 of 8

determines a public hearing is appropriate, the board shall use reasonable efforts to hold those
hearings at a place or places that will reasonably accommodate the interested parties.
(h) The board shall use the office of the attorney general for legal services.
(i) Within ninety (90) days after the end of each fiscal year, the board shall approve and
submit an annual report to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, the president
of the senate, and the secretary of state of its activities during that fiscal year. The report shall
provide: an operating statement summarizing meetings or hearings held, meeting minutes if
requested, subjects addressed, decisions rendered, rules or regulations promulgated, studies
conducted, policies and plans developed, approved, or modified, and programs administered or
initiated; a consolidated financial statement of all funds received and expended including the source
of the funds, a listing of any staff supported by these funds, and a summary of any clerical,
administrative, or technical support received; a summary of performance during the previous fiscal
year including accomplishments, shortcomings, and remedies; a synopsis of hearings, complaints,
suspensions, or other legal matters related to the authority of the board; a summary of any training
courses held pursuant to subsection (b)(5) of this section; a briefing on anticipated activities in the
upcoming fiscal year; and findings and recommendations for improvements. The report shall be
posted electronically on the general assembly and the secretary of state’s websites as prescribed in
§ 42-20-8.2.
42-113-5. Creation of Rhode Island housing and conservation trust fund.
(a) There is created a special account in the state general fund distributed by the Rhode
Island infrastructure bank and administered by the housing and conservation board to be known as
the “Rhode Island housing and conservation trust fund.” The fund shall be administered by the
board and expenditures from the fund shall be made only to implement and effectuate the policies
and purposes of this chapter. The board is authorized to accept any federal funding, private grant,
devise, bequest, donation, gift, loan or assignment of money, bonds, or other valuable securities for
deposit in and credit of the Rhode Island housing and conservation trust fund.
(b) Unexpended balances and any earnings shall not revert to the general fund but shall
remain in the fund designated account created by the Rhode Island infrastructure bank for use in
accord with the purposes of this chapter.
(c) The members of the board and the executive director shall be appointed upon June 23,
1994 December 31, 2026.
42-113-6. General powers and duties.
(a) The board has all of the powers necessary and convenient to carry out and effectuate
the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including without limitation those general powers
LC000615 - Page 5 of 8

provided to a business corporation by and including, without limiting the generality of the
foregoing, the power to:
(1) Upon application from an eligible applicant in a form prescribed by the board, provide
funding in the form of grants or loans for eligible activities;
(2) Enter into cooperative agreements with private organizations or individuals or with any
agency or instrumentality of the United States or of this state to carry out the purposes of this
chapter;
(3) Issue rules in accordance with the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of this title,
for the purpose of administering the provisions of this chapter; and
(4) Make rules and regulations governing the appropriate transfer and/or conversion of
open space lands, provided that these rules and regulations are in accordance with federal and state
guidelines for the conversion of open space lands.
(b) All meetings, records and other documents or functions of the board shall be open to
full public scrutiny.
(c) The board shall promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the purpose of the
authority provided pursuant to subsection (a)(4) of this section.
42-113-7. Allocation system.
(a) In determining the allocation of funds available for the purposes of this chapter, the
board shall evaluate each proposal on the basis of the following criteria:
(1) The need to maintain balance between the dual goals in allocating resources;
(2) The need for a timely response to unpredictable circumstances or special opportunities
to serve the purposes of this chapter;
(3) The level of funding or other participation by private or public sources in the activity
being considered for funding by the board;
(4) What resources will be required in the future to sustain the project;
(5) The need to pursue the goals of this chapter without displacing lower low- and
moderate-income Rhode Islanders Island households; and
(6) The long-term effect of proposed activity and, with respect to low and moderate income
housing households and, the likelihood that the activity will prevent the loss of subsidized housing
units and will result in the preservation of affordability; and in perpetuity.
(7) The eligible applicant has demonstrated a commitment to long-term affordability.
(b) The board’s allocation system shall include a method, defined by rule, that evaluates
the need for, impact of, and quality of, activities proposed by applicants.
(c) Any eligible owner or prospective eligible owner of a development where eligible units
LC000615 - Page 6 of 8

are located will specifically agree to make at least fifty percent (50%) of all units located in the
development available and affordable to eligible tenants on a perpetual basis subject to a long-term
deed restriction as described in the definition of "low- or moderate-income housing" in § 45-53-3.
(d) Twenty-five percent (25%) Thirty-five percent (35%) of the annual funds will be
utilized to fund housing projects, twenty-five percent (25%) thirty-five percent (35%) will support
conservation projects, and the remaining fifty percent (50%) thirty percent (30%) of the total annual
fund can be used for either type of project with projects combining these goals and satisfying the
above factors receiving highest priority.
(e) No more than five percent (5%) of the total annual budget of the board, including funds
to be distributed, shall be devoted to the costs of administration of this chapter.
(f) Housing projects must result in units that are affordable for at least ninety-nine (99)
years with the housing and conservation board retaining first right of refusal in the event of sale or
transfer of property for which funds from this trust fund have been used. Open space conservation
projects for which funds from this trust fund were used must remain for the purpose specified in
the application for which they were granted.
(g) The board shall have the authority to establish, remove, or modify from time to time
according to the administrative procedures act, chapter 35 of this title, rules and regulations
governing application and allocation procedures for grants and other functions necessitated by
administration of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000615
========
LC000615 - Page 7 of 8